Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.610

Deceptive, incorrect vote recording—Misrepresentation as official ballot drop box.

A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who knowingly:

(1) Deceives any voter in recording his or her vote by providing incorrect or misleading recording information or by providing faulty election equipment or records;

(2) Records the vote of any voter in a manner other than as designated by the voter; or

(3) Misrepresents an unofficial ballot collection site or device as an official ballot drop box that has been established by the county auditor.

Such a gross misdemeanor is punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2021 c 85 s 1; 2003 c 111 s 2127. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 4. Formerly RCW 29.85.051.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.